Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1910
Refusal to submit to test; effect.

Any employee who refuses the lawful directive of an employer to provide a body fluid or breath sample as provided in section 48-1903 may be subject to disciplinary or administrative action by the employer, including denial of continued employment.

Laws 1988, LB 582, § 10.